Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 5 Statewide Referenda Elections

17-5-1.
Referenda elections — Constitutional and public questions.

Any proposition of amendment of the Constitution or any public question of statewide impact submitted to the electors of this state at a general election pursuant to §

17-1-2(2)

held subsequent to 1997 shall be held in conformity with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 518, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 411, § 1.

17-5-1.1.
Special referenda elections.

Any proposition of amendment of the Constitution or any other public question submitted to the electors of the state at any election not a general election pursuant to §

17-1-2(2)

shall be held on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday of any month and shall be voted upon at town, ward, and district meetings, in accordance with the following procedure:

When an act of the general assembly is passed authorizing the submission of a question to all of the electors of the state, the secretary of state is authorized to rephrase the question to appear on the ballot in a manner that would clearly apprise the voters of the question to be voted upon and to cause the ballot to contain a concise caption of the question, and the full text of the question as adopted by the general assembly need not appear on the ballot except for proposed amendments to the Constitution of the state of Rhode Island. The secretary of state shall cause each question appearing on the ballot prepared by him or her to be designated by number, the first question to be designated by the numeral I and additional questions shall follow numbered so that all questions submitted to all the electors of the state and appearing upon the ballot are numbered consecutively; provided that local questions shall be printed on a distinctive colored background.

Prior to the election at which public questions are to be submitted, the secretary of state shall cause to be printed and shall send one copy of the full text of each legislative act to be acted upon and applicable to the state at large, or the secretary of state may substitute a description of the text of each act in lieu of the full text, to each residential unit in Rhode Island together with the following information:

The designated number of the question appearing on the ballot;

A brief caption of the question appearing on the ballot; and

A brief explanation of the measure being the subject matter of the question.

Voting on a proposition of amendment of the Constitution or of a public question of statewide impact shall be by means of optical-scan voting equipment and computer ballots authorized pursuant to this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 381, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1983 (s.s.), ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 4.

17-5-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 245, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 80, § 1, effective June 13, 2006.

17-5-3.
Publication of questions to be submitted to voters.

Prior to each general election at which public questions are to be submitted, the secretary of state shall cause to be printed and shall send one copy of the full text of each legislative act to be acted upon and applicable to the state at large, or the secretary of state may substitute a description of the text of each act in lieu of the full text, to each residential unit in Rhode Island together with the following information:

The designated number of the question;

A brief caption of the question;

A brief explanation of the measure that is the subject matter of the question; and

A notice that voter fraud is a felony and the penalty for voter fraud. This notice shall be in conspicuous lettering and shall contain the following language: “You must be registered to vote from your actual place of residence.”

If the public question involves the issuance of bonds or other evidence of indebtedness or any other long term financial obligation such as a lease, the notice required by subsection (a) of this section shall also include at least the following information to be provided by the agency or department for which the bonds or other evidence of indebtedness or any other long term financial obligation is intended:

The estimated total cost of the project or program, including financing (using a reasonable assumed rate of interest), legal, and other costs.

The estimated useful life of the project, and the term of the bonds, other indebtedness, or other obligation.

A reasonably detailed description of the project or program, its purposes, and a project timetable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 4.

17-5-4.
Manner of voting.

Voting on all public questions submitted at the general election shall be by use of optical scan voting equipment and computer ballots authorized pursuant to this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 4.

17-5-5.
Language contained on computer ballots.

Notwithstanding the authority of the secretary of state to determine the design and content of the computer ballots by rules and regulations, all computer ballots shall contain a clear and concise statement of the nature of each question presented without the necessity of repeating the full text of the question as adopted by the general assembly; provided, that in the case of proposed amendments to the Constitution of the state of Rhode Island, the full text as adopted by the general assembly shall be reprinted on the computer ballots. The secretary of state shall cause each question appearing on the computer ballot prepared by the secretary to be designated by number, the first question to be designated by the number I, and additional questions shall be submitted with numbers in consecutive order.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the general election to be held on November 2, 2004, in order to avoid a two-sheet statewide ballot, given the number of public questions to be submitted to the electors at such general election, the secretary of state may prepare the ballot in such manner that the statewide public questions involving the issuance of bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, or other long-term financial obligation, shall appear on the ballot with only a caption and the amount of financial obligation to be incurred, but without the clear and concise statement of each question, as otherwise required. Provided, however, that such clear and concise statement of such question shall instead appear in a conspicuous location within each privacy voting booth at each polling place with additional copies thereof available at each polling place; and for mail ballot voters, each such ballot sent to a mail ballot voter shall be accompanied by a clear and concise statement of each question printed on a separate sheet of paper.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the general election to be held on November 4, 2014, in order to avoid a multiple page statewide ballot, given the number of public questions to be submitted to the electors at such general election, the secretary of state may prepare the ballot in such manner that the statewide public questions involving the issuance of bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, or other long-term financial obligation, shall appear on the ballot with only a caption and the amount of financial obligation to be incurred, but without the clear and concise statement of each question, as otherwise required; provided, however, that such clear and concise statement of such question shall instead appear in a conspicuous location within each privacy voting booth at each polling place with additional copies thereof available at each polling place; and for mail ballot voters, each such ballot sent to a mail ballot voter shall be accompanied by a clear and concise statement of each question printed on a separate sheet of paper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 588, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 286, § 1.

17-5-6.
Count of votes — Declaration of results.

Through the use of optical scan voting equipment authorized pursuant to this title, the state board shall count and tabulate all votes cast and shall declare the result in the manner provided by law, and this declaration shall be a sufficient notice to all officers, and all other persons interested, of the adoption or the rejection of any amendment of the Constitution or of the manner in which any question submitted to the electors of the state has been decided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 4.